apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="w/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="plug__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ged</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ging</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dub__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bed</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bed</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bing</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="sob__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bed</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bed</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bing</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="program__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>med</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>med</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ming</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ag/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="t/ake__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ake</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>akes</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ook</l>       <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aken</l>      <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aking</l>     <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ell__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ell</l>       <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ell</l>       <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ells</l>      <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>old</l>       <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elling</l>    <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="liv/e__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/et__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>otten</l>     <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etting</l>    <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/ive__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iven</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cut__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ting</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/ing__vblex__sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="age">             <i>ag</i><par n="ag/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beg">             <i>beg</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bring together">  <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="clog">            <i>clog</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dab">             <i>dab</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drag">            <i>drag</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drum">            <i>drum</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dub">             <i>dub</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="give up">         <i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get up">              <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get PRN back">          <i>w</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g>PRN<b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get back">              <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get back out">              <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back<b/>out</l><r><g><b/>back<b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sell out">              <i>g</i><par n="s/ell__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sell up">              <i>g</i><par n="s/ell__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get up">          <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get back">        <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="grab">            <i>grab</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hem">             <i>hem</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jam">             <i>jam</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jog">             <i>jog</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="line up">         <i>lin</i><par n="liv/e__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="log">             <i>log</i><par n="plug__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="note down">       <i>not</i><par n="liv/e__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="plug">            <i>plug</i><par n="plug__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ram">             <i>ram</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rob">             <i>rob</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rub">             <i>rub</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sell out">        <i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sell up">         <i>s</i><par n="s/ell__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set about">       <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><g><b/>about</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set up">          <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shut down">       <i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="slam">            <i>slam</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sob">             <i>sob</i><par n="dub__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stab">            <i>stab</i><par n="sob__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="take off">        <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take out">        <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take away">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take over">       <i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r><g><b/>over</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="trace back">      <i>trac</i><par n="liv/e__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="trim">            <i>trim</i><par n="program__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="win">             <i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
